District of Columbia statutes.
29-301.20

Number of shareholders.

(a)

For the purposes of this chapter, the following identified as a shareholder in a corporation’s current record of shareholders constitutes one shareholder:

(1)

Three or fewer co-owners;

(2)

A corporation, partnership, trust, estate, or other entity;

(3)

The trustees, guardians, custodians, or other fiduciaries of a single trust, estate, or account.

(b)

For the purposes of this chapter, shareholdings registered in substantially similar names shall constitute one shareholder if it is reasonable to believe that the names represent the same person.

History

July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 2, 58 DCR 1720